Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 6. Attorney General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A C.J.S. Attorney General § 1 et seq.

§ 9-1-601.
Appointment; term; removal; special assistant for legislative affairs; qualifications.

The attorney general of the state of Wyoming shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

If a newly elected governor appoints an attorney general to take office prior to or during the legislative session next following the governor’s election, the newly appointed attorney general designee shall become a member of the attorney general’s staff to serve as a special assistant to the governor for legislative affairs. When the legislative session adjourns the attorney general’s term of office shall terminate.

Prior to his appointment, the attorney general shall have been a practicing attorney for at least four (4) years. At the date of appointment, he shall be in good standing in the courts of record of this state and shall be a resident and elector of the state.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 94, 95; C.S. 1910, §§ 138, 139; C.S. 1920, §§ 147, 148; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-601, 109-602; C.S. 145, §§ 18-901, 18-902; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-121, 9-122; Laws 1975, ch. 148, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-2-501

, 9-2-502; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2001, ch. 152, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to attorneys-at-law, see §§

33-5-101

to

33-5-117

.

Stated

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

§ 9-1-602.
Vacancy in office.

In case of a vacancy in the office of attorney general the governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 28-12-101(b).

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 22, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 98; C.S. 1910, § 142; C.S. 1920, § 151; R.S. 1931, § 109-605; C.S. 1945, § 18-904; W.S. 1957, § 9-124; Laws 1975, ch. 148, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-504; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2001, ch. 152, § 1.

§ 9-1-603.
Duties generally; retention of qualified practicing attorneys; matters in which county or state is party or has interest; assistance to county and district attorneys in felony trials; coordination of county and school safety activities; bankruptcy proceedings.

The attorney general shall:

Prosecute and defend all suits instituted by or against the state of Wyoming, the prosecution and defense of which is not otherwise provided for by law;

Represent the state in criminal cases in the supreme court;

Defend suits brought against state officers in their official relations, except suits brought against them by the state;

Represent the state in suits, actions or claims in which the state is interested in either the Wyoming supreme court or any United States court;

Be the legal adviser of all elective and appointive state officers and of the county and district attorneys of the state;

When requested, give written opinions upon questions submitted to him by elective and appointive state officers and by either branch of the legislature, when in session;

Effective July 1, 2000, serve as the designated agency to administer the Wyoming governor’s council on developmental disabilities. A memorandum of understanding shall be executed by and between the designated agency and the governor’s council, which shall incorporate the provisions of the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act, 42 U.S.C. 6024;

Approve or disapprove any contract submitted to him for review within thirty (30) days of submission;

Establish a call center to accept information related to school and student safety issues and assist in the delivery of that information as necessary to allow for the coordination of local law enforcement, emergency response personnel and school district officials. To the extent possible, the identity of parties reporting information via the call center shall remain unknown to all persons and entities. The attorney general may enact rules as necessary to administer the duties required under this paragraph;

Supervise the Medicaid fraud control unit created by W.S.

42-4-401

et seq.

With the approval of the governor the attorney general may retain qualified practicing attorneys to prosecute fee-generating suits for the state if expertise in a particular field is desirable.

Upon the failure or refusal of any district or county attorney to act in any criminal or civil case or matter in which the county, state or any agency thereof is a party, or has an interest, the attorney general may, at the request of the board of county commissioners of the county involved or of the district judge of the judicial district involved, act on behalf of the county, state or any agency thereof, if after a thorough investigation the action is deemed advisable by the attorney general. The cost of investigation and the cost of any prosecution arising therefrom shall be paid out of the general fund of the county where the investigation and prosecution take place. The attorney general shall also, upon direction of the governor, investigate any matter in any county of the state in which the county, state or any agency thereof may be interested. After investigation, the attorney general shall submit a report of the investigation to the governor and to the district or county attorney of each county involved and may take such other action as he deems appropriate.

When requested by a county or district attorney, the attorney general may assign a member of his staff who is experienced in trial work and in the prosecution of criminal cases to assist in the prosecution of a felony.

All records or information related to the operation of the call center required under paragraph (a)(ix) of this section are confidential and shall not be deemed a public record under W.S.

16-4-201

et seq. Except pursuant to a court order, the attorney general shall not be compelled to produce any materials obtained in relation to the operation of the call center.

Notwithstanding W.S. 18-3-302(a)(i) or subsection (c) of this section, at the request of the board of county commissioners and if deemed advisable by the attorney general, the attorney general may consult with or act jointly with the county attorney or may act on behalf of the county in a bankruptcy proceeding where the county has an interest in collecting taxes from the entity seeking bankruptcy. The costs of the bankruptcy proceeding shall be allocated pursuant to an agreement between the state and the county.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 22, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 99; C.S. 1910, § 145; C.S. 1920, § 154; R.S. 1931, § 109-608; C.S. 1945, § 18-905; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-125, 9-125.1; Laws 1969, ch. 209, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; ch. 224, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-505, 9-2-506; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2000, ch. 50, § 1; 2004, ch. 132, § 2; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2016 ch. 100, § 1, effective March 11, 2016; 2019 ch. 96, § 2, effective February 26, 2019; 2020 ch. 23, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to duty to furnish advice and assistance to state agencies in the preparation and revision of regulations, see §

16-3-104

.

As to appointing members of board of registration for professional engineers and professional land surveyors, see § 33-29-115.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(viii).

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(vii), inserted “Wyoming,” and deleted “planning” preceding “council” twice.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2016 amendment,

added (a)(ix) and (e).

Laws 2016, ch. 100, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

The 2019 amendment,

added (a)(x).

Laws 2019, ch. 96 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

The 2020 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2020, ch. 23, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 50, § 2, transfers all funds and positions for the governor's planning council on developmental disabilities from the office of the governor to the office of the attorney general, effective July 1, 2000.

State's rights. —

Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 4, provides: “If the federal government attempts, contrary to law, to impose any interpretation on P.L. 104-109 that prevents the state from using state maintenance of effort funds as the state wishes or which requires state maintenance of effort funds to comply with restrictions not found in state law, the attorney general shall seek to the extent practical an appropriate legal or equitable remedy to prevent the federal government from enforcing any such interpretation.”

Federal law. —

The Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6024, was repealed, P.L. 106-402, October 30, 2000. For present similar provisions see 42 U.S.C. § 15022 et seq.

Section serves as check on county attorney by executive agent. —

This section is not an abrogation of the executive function by the district court but rather a check on the county attorney by another executive agent. In re Padget, 678 P.2d 870,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1984).

Representation of state in criminal cases before supreme court. —

In that the attorney general shall represent the state in all criminal cases in the supreme court, a county and prosecuting attorney has no standing to do so or to bring an application for rehearing. Kwallek v. State, 596 P.2d 1372,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 379

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 596 P.2d 1372,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 384

(Wyo. 1979), reh'g denied, 596 P.2d 1372,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1979), reh'g denied, 596 P.2d 1372,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1979).

Where the record on appeal has been filed with the supreme court, the attorney general acquires complete charge of the state's case such that he may not be bypassed by the county prosecuting attorney's attempt to supplement the record by entering into a stipulation. Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981).

Failure to serve appeal brief on attorney general

is sufficient ground for dismissal of appeal. State v. Kelly, 33 Wyo. 420, 240 P. 207,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1925).

A writ of error in a criminal case will be dismissed where no copy of the brief has been served upon, or has ever come into the hands of, the attorney general, although the failure to serve the attorney general was caused through inadvertence and mistake and service has been made upon the prosecuting officer of the proper county. Wilhelm v. State, 13 Wyo. 511, 81 P. 882,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1905).

Effect of opinion published by deputy attorney general. —

Attorney general cannot escape the consequences or effect of an official published legal opinion issued from his office by a deputy attorney general without withdrawal or reversal of the opinion. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Officers and agencies may not routinely present inquiries to court for guidance. —

A court determination may be necessary on issues already presented to the attorney general for an opinion, but it is not contemplated that state officers and agencies may routinely present their inquiries to the district court for guidance. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

Applied

in

Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

State v. Selig, 635 P.2d 786,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Big Horn Power Co. v. State, 23 Wyo. 271, 148 P. 1110,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1915); State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding of Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see 11 Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

For article, “A Preliminary Review of Wyoming's Revised Civil Commitment Procedures,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1982).

For article, “Ethical Considerations When Representing Organizations,” see 3 Wyo. L. Rev. 581 (2003).

§ 9-1-604.
Office in state capital; private practice prohibited; exception.

The attorney general shall keep an office in the state capital, shall not open an office elsewhere and shall not engage in any private practice except to consummate business pending at the time of his appointment if not in conflict with the duties of his office.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 22, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 97; Laws 1907, ch. 19, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 141; Laws 1919, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 150; Laws 1921, ch. 95, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 109-604; Laws 1945, ch. 80, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 18-906; Laws 1947, ch. 87, § 1; 1949, ch. 65, § 8; 1951, ch. 44, § 4; 1953, ch. 139, § 6; 1957, ch. 157, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-126; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 12; 1963, ch. 116, § 2; 1965, ch. 115, § 12; 1967, ch. 181, § 3; 1969, ch. 168, § 10; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-508; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2014 ch. 40, § 2, effective March 6, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “state capital” for “state capitol building.”

Laws 2014, ch. 40, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 6, 2014.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 7, ch. 22, Laws 1899, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 9-1-605.
Approval of public securities and official bonds; water rights proceedings; investigation of misconduct of county official; report to governor; commencement of action.

The attorney general shall examine, pass upon and approve:

Public securities before permanent funds of the state are invested in them;

Official bonds executed by state officers.

Under the direction of the governor the attorney general shall institute and pursue proceedings to maintain the state’s and its citizens’ rights in the waters of interstate streams.

Upon representation to the governor of misconduct or malfeasance in office or the commission of a crime by any county officer in the state and if the governor believes the ends of justice demand or the matter will not be properly investigated and prosecuted by the sheriff and by the district attorney of the county, the governor may direct the attorney general to investigate the case.

Upon completion of the investigation, the attorney general shall report the results of the investigation and his recommendations to the governor. If the governor and the attorney general determine that the attorney general should institute a criminal or civil action, the attorney general shall commence the action. The attorney general shall have the authority and duty vested in district attorneys in this state.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 96, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 100; Laws 1907, ch. 19, § 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 143, 146; Laws 1911, ch. 43, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 152, 155, 156; R.S. 1931, §§ 109-606, 109-609, 109-610; C.S. 1945, §§ 18-907, 18-909, 18-910; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-127 to 9-129; Laws 1971, ch. 258, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-509 to 9-2-511; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to interstate streams commission, see §

41-11-101

.

§ 9-1-606.
“State official”; defense thereof in civil suit; reimbursement of state.

For the purposes of this section, “state official” means the head of any state agency or an elected state executive official.

When any state official is sued for an official act in a civil lawsuit not involving a tort action governed by W.S.

1-39-104

, the attorney general shall provide defense counsel from the attorney general’s office or by contracting with private counsel at state expense.

If the judgment in the lawsuit finds the state official was acting outside the scope of his employment, the state official shall reimburse the state for all expenditures made in his defense.

This section shall not be construed to limit the right or obligation of the state to defend any state employee.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 7, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-518; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see 15 Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

§ 9-1-607.
Deputy attorneys general; appointment; qualifications; term; duties; certificate of appointment and oath of office.

The attorney general may appoint two (2) deputies, one (1) for civil affairs and one (1) for criminal affairs. Each deputy shall be a member of the Wyoming bar in good standing and shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general. Each deputy shall have the qualifications and perform the duties required by the attorney general.

When a deputy is appointed the attorney general shall file in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of appointment and the official oath of office of the deputy. The deputy shall not perform any official act until the certificate has been filed.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 51, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 148; C.S. 1920, § 158; R.S. 1931, § 109-612; C.S. 1945, § 18-912; Laws 1955, ch. 90, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-130, 9-131; Laws 1973, ch. 224, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-512, 9-2-513; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to powers of deputies generally, see §

1-1-103

.

Effect of opinion published by deputy attorney general. —

The attorney general cannot escape the consequences or effect of an official published legal opinion issued from his office by a deputy attorney general without withdrawal or reversal of the opinion. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 9-1-608.
Assistant attorneys general.

With the approval of the governor, the attorney general may appoint assistant attorneys general necessary for the efficient operation of his office. Each assistant attorney general shall be a member in good standing of the Wyoming bar and shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general. The assistants shall act under the direction of the attorney general and his deputies. The attorney general, his deputies or his assistants may appear in any courts of the state or the United States and prosecute or defend on behalf of the state. An appearance by the attorney general or his staff does not waive the sovereign immunity of the state.

With the approval of the governor the attorney general may appoint special assistant attorneys general for any purposes. A person shall not be employed as an attorney or legal counsel by any department, board, agency, commission or institution of the state, or represent the state in that capacity, except by the written appointment of the attorney general. Written appointment of the attorney general shall not be required for the employment of legal counsel by elected state officials.

At the request of any state department, board, agency, commission or institution, the attorney general may assign special assistant attorneys general to the department, board, agency, commission or institution.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 90, §§ 2 to 4; 1957, ch. 74, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-132 to 9-134; Laws 1973, ch. 224, § 2; ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-514 to 9-2-516; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2004, ch. 132, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last sentence in (b).

Protection against abuse of state laws. —

Under the provisions of subsection (a), the attorney general has the power and duty to protect the state and its citizens against abuse of its laws. Zweifel v. State, 517 P.2d 493,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Williams v. Eaton, 443 F.2d 422, 1971 U.S. App. LEXIS 10184 (10th Cir. 1971).

§ 9-1-609.
Salary of deputy attorneys general.

The deputy attorneys general shall receive an annual salary determined by the personnel division.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 90, § 5; 1957, ch. 157, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 9-136; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 13; 1965, ch. 115, § 13; 1967, ch. 181, § 4; 1969, ch. 168, § 11; 1971, ch. 190, § 4; 1973, ch. 224, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-517; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For duties of human resources division, see §

9-2-1022

.

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 6, ch. 90, Laws 1955, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

§ 9-1-610.
Administrative and clerical personnel.

Subject to the rules of the personnel division, the attorney general may employ administrative and clerical personnel necessary for the efficient operation of his office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 224, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-125.2; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-507; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to promulgation of rules by human resources division, see §

9-2-1022

.

§ 9-1-611.
Division of criminal investigation; created; definitions; director; appointment; qualifications.

The Wyoming division of criminal investigation is created within the office of the attorney general.

As used in this act:

“Agent” means an agent of the division;

“Director” means the director of the division;

“Division” means the Wyoming division of criminal investigation;

“This act” means W.S.

9-1-611

through

9-1-627

.

With the approval of the governor, the attorney general shall appoint a director who is the chief administrative officer and chief agent of the division.

The director shall be a professional law enforcement officer, experienced in modern methods for the detection of crime and the apprehension of criminals. He shall possess the qualifications of an agent under W.S.

9-1-613

and shall have a thorough working knowledge of criminal law and the law of criminal procedure, including the law of arrest, search and seizure and interrogation of criminal suspects. The director shall possess other qualifications required by the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-136.1 to 9-136.3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-530 to 9-2-532; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 32, § 1.

Discharge from division not protected by fifth amendment. —

Discharge from the division is not a hazard against which the fifth amendment incrimination clause provides protection. Johnston v. Herschler, 669 F.2d 617, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22484 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 9-1-612.
Duties of director; deputy directors; appointment; duties; capitol security; security personnel requirements and powers.

The director shall supervise and direct all activities of the division. Subject to the written approval of the attorney general, the director shall prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with law to implement this act. The director is responsible to the attorney general for the operation of the division.

With the approval of the attorney general the director may appoint one (1) or more deputy directors who shall perform duties as assigned by the director.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 45, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-136.4 to 9-136.6; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-533 to 9-2-535; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 178, § 2; 1991, ch. 92, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1; 1996, ch. 68, § 1; 2001, ch. 45, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 45, § 3, transfers all personnel, equipment, and funding for the capitol police within the division of criminal investigation to the Wyoming highway patrol.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-1-611(a)(iv).

Applicability. —

Laws 1996, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 1, 1996, provides that the act applies to capitol police designated and appointed after July 1, 1996. The section further provides that the capitol police employed prior to July 1, 1996 may elect to contribute and receive service retirement benefits under the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program in lieu of contribution under the Wyoming retirement system, provides for the transfer of contributions pursuant to this election, makes these electors subject to certain benefit provisions, provides for the determination by the actuary for the Wyoming retirement system of the financial and actuarial impact of participation in the Wyoming state highway patrol, game and fish warden and criminal investigator retirement program, and provides for payment for the actuary determination by the attorney general.

Quoted

in

Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Marshall v. State ex rel. DOT, 941 P.2d 42,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1997); Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 9-1-613.
Division agents; appointment; qualifications; continuing education; appointment of persons with specific skills.

The director shall appoint agents who are professional law enforcement officers of honesty, integrity and outstanding ability. Agents shall be adults and shall have at least five (5) years experience in law enforcement including the detection and investigation of criminal activities or shall possess the educational qualifications required by the director after consultation with and approval by the attorney general and the personnel division.

The director shall establish a system of continuing education and training to ensure that agents of the division are informed of developments in criminal investigative techniques, criminal law and the law of criminal procedure.

The director may employ persons possessing specific skills in the areas of forensic science, criminal identification and the gathering, processing, analysis and security of criminal intelligence.

The director may appoint as agents persons possessing specific skills in the area of criminal investigation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.7; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-536; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 32, § 1.

Cited

in

Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980); Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 9-1-614.
Division agents; administrative and clerical employees.

Subject to the requirements of the personnel division, the director may employ administrative and clerical employees necessary for the efficient operation of the division.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.8; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-537; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-615.
Division agents; power and authority of agents.

Each agent of the division has the power and authority of any law enforcement officer in this state.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.9; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-538; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Quoted

in

Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 9-1-616.
Cooperation with other law enforcement agencies; concurrent jurisdiction.

The division shall cooperate with federal, state, tribal and local law enforcement agencies and officers for the efficient investigation of criminal activity and swift apprehension of persons suspected of violating the criminal laws of this state.

The division shall have concurrent jurisdiction and powers with, and shall not usurp or supersede the jurisdiction and powers of any other law enforcement agencies and officers in this state. However this limitation shall not apply to functions of the division described in W.S. 9-1-618(b).

The division, in accordance with the Wyoming Criminal History Record Act, W.S.

7-19-101

through

7-19-109

, shall cooperate with similar agencies of other states and the federal government for the purpose of developing and carrying on a complete interstate, national and international system of criminal identification.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246,§ 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.10; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-539; Laws 1982, ch. 62,§ 3; 1986, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 163, § 2; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment

, effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “, tribal” following “federal, state.”

§ 9-1-617.
Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers.

Any agent required to perform any official function under this act is entitled to the protections, defenses or immunities provided by law to safeguard a peace officer in the performance of official acts.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.11; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-540; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-1-611(a)(iv).

§ 9-1-618.
Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers; general assistance to state, county or local authorities; investigative duties.

With approval of the attorney general, the division may:

Assist a state, county or local law enforcement authority which requests assistance in investigating and detecting crime and in enforcing the criminal laws of the state;

Assist in the preparation and prosecution of any criminal case when assistance is requested by a county or district attorney.

The division shall investigate:

Suspected criminal activity when directed by the governor to do so;

Suspected violations of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971 and shall perform all the duties of a law enforcement officer under that act;

Organized crime which crosses jurisdictional boundaries of local law enforcement agencies;

Suspected violations of computer crimes as specified in W.S.

6-3-501

through

6-3-507

;

Suspected violations involving the sexual exploitation of children as specified in W.S.

6-4-303

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.12; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-541; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 59, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2017 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(ii), inserted “shall” following “Controlled Substances Act of 1971 and.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(iv), substituted “6-3-507” for “6-3-505.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-1-619.
Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers; duty of sheriffs and police to receive and detain prisoners.

Any sheriff, chief of police or other person having charge of a jail or other place of detention shall receive any prisoner arrested by agents of the division within the jurisdiction served by the jail or place of detention and shall detain the person in custody in the same manner as if he were arrested by a peace officer within the jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.13; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-542; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-620.
Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers; agents' credentials; accepting rewards prohibited; oath; political participation prohibited.

The attorney general shall issue proper credentials to each agent of the division.

An agent or employee of the division shall not accept a reward offered for the apprehension or conviction of any person or for the recovery of any property.

Each agent of the division shall subscribe to the oath or affirmation required of other public officials.

An agent or employee of the division shall not participate in partisan, state or local politics.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-136.14 to 9-136.17; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-543 to 9-2-546; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§§ 9-1-621 and 9-1-622.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 32, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to Wyoming division of criminal investigation, see §§

9-1-611

through

9-1-627

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1, related to the creation, director, rules and regulations, and employees of the criminal identification division.

§ 9-1-623.
Division of criminal investigation; identification systems; information recorded; persons included; systematic maintenance and indexing.

The division shall establish and maintain complete systems for the identification of criminals which comply with modern and accepted methods in the field of criminal identification. The division, in accordance with the Wyoming Criminal History Record Act, W.S.

7-19-101

through

7-19-109

, shall obtain, file and preserve for record plates, photographs, outline pictures, fingerprints, measurements, descriptions, modus operandi statements and other information relating to persons who have been:

Convicted of or arrested for any felony;

Convicted of or arrested for a high misdemeanor or other misdemeanor determined by the division;

Convicted of violating any of the military, naval or criminal laws of the United States; or

Convicted of a crime in any other state, country, district or province which, if committed within this state, would be a felony.

All information kept by the division shall be maintained, recorded and indexed in a systematic manner for the purpose of providing a convenient and expeditious method of consultation and comparison.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.23; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-564; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 163, § 2.

§ 9-1-624.
Division of criminal investigation; uniform procedures and forms for collecting and disseminating identification data; missing persons repository; annual crime statistics report; agencies to cooperate.

The division shall:

Establish uniform procedures and forms for collecting and disseminating criminal identification data;

Assist law enforcement agencies in establishing and implementing uniform procedures;

Cooperate with the law enforcement academy to provide to law enforcement agencies and their personnel training, assistance and instruction in the gathering and dissemination of criminal identification data;

Provide a system for communicating criminal identification data among law enforcement agencies in and outside the state.

Act as a central repository of information and operate a clearinghouse database on missing persons from Wyoming. As a function of the central repository:

The division shall prepare and make publicly available an annual report on information compiled from the missing person clearinghouse. The report shall include biographical information collected on missing persons and include information submitted by federal, state, tribal and local law enforcement agencies located in Wyoming;

The division may make publicly available information about ongoing missing person investigations to aid the efficient investigation and swift recovery of missing persons or when otherwise in the public interest.

At least annually, compile a report on Wyoming crime statistics and make the report publicly available. The report shall include crime statistics submitted by federal, state, tribal and local law enforcement agencies in addition to the information received pursuant to W.S.

7-19-407

and

7-20-107

.

All law enforcement agencies within the state shall cooperate with the division in establishing and maintaining an efficient and coordinated system of identification and in reporting missing persons information to the division.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.24; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-565; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2020 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(v) and (a)(vi); in (b), added “and in reporting missing persons information to the division” at the end.

§ 9-1-625.
Division of criminal investigation; adult arrestees to be processed accordingly; data on persons in state custodial institutions; minors.

When an adult is arrested for a felony, high misdemeanor or other misdemeanor determined by the division, the law enforcement agency responsible for the arrest shall process the person in accordance with the uniform procedures prescribed by the division. The law enforcement agency shall send to the division any information required under the Wyoming Criminal History Record Act, W.S.

7-19-101

through

7-19-109

, and any additional information requested by the division. An agency making arrests covered by this section may enter into arrangements with other agencies for the purpose of furnishing required information to the division on its behalf.

The administrators of state penal institutions and the superintendents of the Wyoming boys’ school and the Wyoming girls’ school shall furnish to the division, in the manner and according to the methods prescribed by the division, photographs, fingerprints, modus operandi statements and other required identification of all persons confined in the respective institutions together with any information required under the Wyoming Criminal History Record Act, W.S.

7-19-101

through

7-19-109

.

No minor shall be photographed or fingerprinted except in accordance with the Juvenile Justice Act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-136.25; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-566; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 163, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to state penitentiary generally, see §§

25-2-101

and

25-2-102

.

As to the Wyoming women's center, see §

25-2-103

.

As to the Wyoming boys' school, see §§

25-3-101

to

25-3-106

.

As to the Wyoming girls' school, see §§

25-4-101

to

25-4-103

.

As to the Training School Act of 1981, see §§

25-5-101

to

25-5-134

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), substituted “Juvenile Justice Act” for “Juvenile Court Act.”

Juvenile Court Act. —

Laws 1971, ch. 255, § 1, codified as §

14-8-101

, provided that §§ 1 through 44 of the act would be cited as the Juvenile Court Act of 1971. Section

14-8-101

was omitted by the 1978 revision of title 14. Present provisions corresponding to former §§

14-8-102

through 14-8-144 appear at §§

14-6-201

through

14-6-243

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USCS §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of 137 ALR Fed 481.

§ 9-1-626.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 32, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to cooperation of division with similar agencies, see § 9-1-616(c).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 246, § 1, related to cooperation of criminal identification division with agencies in other jurisdictions.